v11.dix
<pardef n="koV/lYlYu_v">
        <e><p>
                <l>Mdanu</l>
                <r>lYlYu<s n="verb"/><s n="singular"/><s n="masc"/><s n="past"/><s n="third_person"/></r>
        </p></e>
		<e><p>
                <l>MdalYu</l>
                <r>lYlYu<s n="verb"/><s n="singular"/><s n="fem"/><s n="past"/><s n="third_person"/></r>
        </p></e>
		<e><p>
                <l>Mdiwu</l>
                <r>lYlYu<s n="verb"/><s n="singular"/><s n="neut"/><s n="past"/><s n="third_person"/></r>
        </p></e>
		<e><p>
                <l>Mdavu</l>
                <r>lYlYu<s n="verb"/><s n="plural"/><s n="neut"/><s n="past"/><s n="third_person"/></r>
        </p></e>
		<e><p>
                <l>Mdaru</l>
                <r>lYlYu<s n="verb"/><s n="plural"/><s n="past"/><s n="third_person"/></r>
        </p></e>
		<e><p>
                <l>MdeV</l>
                <r>lYlYu<s n="verb"/><s n="singular"/><s n="past"/><s n="second_person"/></r>
        </p></e>
		<e><p>
                <l>Mdiri</l>
                <r>lYlYu<s n="verb"/><s n="plural"/><s n="past"/><s n="second_person"/></r>
        </p></e>
		<e><p>
                <l>MdeVnu</l>
                <r>lYlYu<s n="verb"/><s n="singular"/><s n="past"/><s n="first_person"/></r>
        </p></e>
		<e><p>
                <l>MdeVvu</l>
                <r>lYlYu<s n="verb"/><s n="plural"/><s n="past"/><s n="first_person"/></r>
        </p></e>
		
		<e><p>
                <l>lYlYuwwixxAneV</l>
				<r>lYlYu<s n="verb"/><s n="singular"/><s n="masc"/><s n="present"/><s n="third_person"/></r>
        </p></e>
		<e><p>
                <l>lYlYuwwixxAlYeV</l>
				<r>lYlYu<s n="verb"/><s n="singular"/><s n="fem"/><s n="present"/><s n="third_person"/></r>
        </p></e>
		<e><p>
                <l>lYlYuwwixeV</l>
				<r>lYlYu<s n="verb"/><s n="singular"/><s n="neut"/><s n="present"/><s n="third_person"/></r>
        </p></e>
		<e><p>
                <l>lYlYuwwiveV</l>
				<r>lYlYu<s n="verb"/><s n="plural"/><s n="neut"/><s n="present"/><s n="third_person"/></r>
        </p></e>
		<e><p>
                <l>lYlYuwwixxeveV</l>
				<r>lYlYu<s n="verb"/><s n="plural"/><s n="present"/><s n="third_person"/></r>
        </p></e>
		<e><p>
                <l>lYlYuwwixxIya</l>
                <r>lYlYu<s n="verb"/><s n="singular"/><s n="present"/><s n="second_person"/></r>
        </p></e>
		<e><p>
                <l>lYlYuwwixxIri</l>
                <r>lYlYu<s n="verb"/><s n="plural"/><s n="present"/><s n="second_person"/></r>
        </p></e>
		<e><p>
                <l>lYlYuwwixxeneV</l>
                <r>lYlYu<s n="verb"/><s n="singular"/><s n="present"/><s n="first_person"/></r>
        </p></e>
		<e><p>
                <l>lYlYuwwiruveVnu</l>
                <r>lYlYu<s n="verb"/><s n="singular"/><s n="present"/><s n="first_person"/></r>
        </p></e>
		<e><p>
                <l>lYlYuwwixxeveV</l>
                <r>lYlYu<s n="verb"/><s n="plural"/><s n="present"/><s n="first_person"/></r>
        </p></e>
		<e><p>
                <l>lYlYuwwiruveVvu</l>
                <r>lYlYu<s n="verb"/><s n="plural"/><s n="present"/><s n="first_person"/></r>
        </p></e>
		<e><p>
                <l>lYlYuxxAneV</l>
				<r>lYlYu<s n="verb"/><s n="singular"/><s n="masc"/><s n="future"/><s n="third_person"/></r>
        </p></e>
		<e><p>
                <l>lYlYuxxAlYeV</l>
				<r>lYlYu<s n="verb"/><s n="singular"/><s n="fem"/><s n="future"/><s n="third_person"/></r>
        </p></e>
		<e><p>
                <l>lYlYuwwaxeV</l>
				<r>lYlYu<s n="verb"/><s n="singular"/><s n="neut"/><s n="future"/><s n="third_person"/></r>
        </p></e>
		<e><p>
                <l>lYlYuwwaveV</l>
				<r>lYlYu<s n="verb"/><s n="plural"/><s n="neut"/><s n="future"/><s n="third_person"/></r>
        </p></e>
		<e><p>
                <l>lYlYuwwAreV</l>
				<r>lYlYu<s n="verb"/><s n="plural"/><s n="future"/><s n="third_person"/></r>
        </p></e>
		<e><p>
                <l>lYlYuwwIya</l>
                <r>lYlYu<s n="verb"/><s n="singular"/><s n="future"/><s n="second_person"/></r>
        </p></e>
		<e><p>
                <l>lYlYuwwIri</l>
                <r>lYlYu<s n="verb"/><s n="plural"/><s n="future"/><s n="second_person"/></r>
        </p></e>
		<e><p>
                <l>lYlYuviri</l>
                <r>lYlYu<s n="verb"/><s n="plural"/><s n="future"/><s n="second_person"/></r>
        </p></e>
		<e><p>
                <l>lYlYuwweneV</l>
                <r>lYlYu<s n="verb"/><s n="singular"/><s n="future"/><s n="first_person"/></r>
        </p></e>
		<e><p>
				<l>lYlYuveVnu</l>
                <r>lYlYu<s n="verb"/><s n="singular"/><s n="future"/><s n="first_person"/></r>
        </p></e>
		<e><p>
                <l>lYlYuwweveV</l>
                <r>lYlYu<s n="verb"/><s n="plural"/><s n="future"/><s n="first_person"/></r>
        </p></e>
		<e><p>
                <l>lYlYuveVvu</l>
                <r>lYlYu<s n="verb"/><s n="plural"/><s n="future"/><s n="first_person"/></r>
        </p></e>
		
</pardef>

<e lm="koVlYlYu"><i>koV</i><par n="koV/lYlYu_v"/></e>
<e lm="anisikoVlYlYu"><i>anisikoV</i><par n="koV/lYlYu_v"/></e>
<e lm="naMjikoVlYlYu"><i>naMjikoV</i><par n="koV/lYlYu_v"/></e>
<e lm="bIlYkoVlYlYu"><i>bIlYkoV</i><par n="koV/lYlYu_v"/></e>
<e lm="sUreVgoVlYlYu"><i>sUreVgoV</i><par n="koV/lYlYu_v"/></e>
